Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB469.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 30 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 2707.3. Law enforcement.(a) Eligibility.--The commission or a county treasurer shall issue one annual resident fishing license at a cost of $1 to any person eligible for the license under section 2701 (relating to resident fishing licenses) who provides documentation that the person is employed as an officer in this Commonwealth OR RETIRED AS AN OFFICER IN THIS COMMONWEALTH . (b) Regulations.--The commission may promulgate regulations to implement this section.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following <--12345678910111213141516171819 words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Law enforcement agency." Any of the following:(1) A public agency of a political subdivision having general police powers and charged with making arrests in connection with the enforcement of criminal or traffic laws.(2) A campus police or university police department, as used in section 2416 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, certified by the Office of Attorney General as a criminal justice agency as defined under 18 Pa.C.S. § 9102 (relating to definitions).(3) A railroad or street railway police department formed with officers commissioned under 22 Pa.C.S. Ch. 33 (relating to railroad and street railway police) or any prior statute providing for the commissioning.(4) An airport authority police department, including the Harrisburg International Airport Police.(5) A county park police force created under section 2511(b) of the former act of August 9, 1955 (P.L.323, No.130), known as The County Code, or 16 Pa.C.S. § 16511(b) (relating to employees and police)."Officer." The term shall include the following:(1) An employee of a law enforcement agency who is empowered to enforce the provisions of 18 Pa.C.S. (relating to crimes and offenses) and other laws of this Commonwealth.(2) A member of the Pennsylvania State Police.(3) A corrections officer as defined under 61 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions).(4) A waterways patrolman and a deputy waterways 20250SB0469PN1832 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 patrolman as the terms are defined in section 102 (relating to definitions).(5) An officer as defined under 34 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions).(6) A county sheriff, full-time deputy sheriff employed by a county sheriff in this Commonwealth or a part-time deputy sheriff employed by a county sheriff in this Commonwealth.Section 2. Section 2706 of Title 34 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 2706. Resident license and fee exemptions.* * *(i) Law enforcement hunting licenses.--(1) Law enforcement hunting licenses shall be issued by the commission, county treasurer or issuing agent to any person otherwise eligible for a resident hunting license in this Commonwealth who provides documentation that the person is employed in this Commonwealth as an officer OR RETIRED AS AN OFFICER IN THIS COMMONWEALTH . (2) The commission may promulgate regulations to implement this subsection.(3) As used in this subsection, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this paragraph unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Law enforcement agency." Any of the following:(i) A public agency of a political subdivision having general police powers and charged with making arrests in connection with the enforcement of criminal or traffic laws.(ii) A campus police or university police 20250SB0469PN1832 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department, as used in section 2416 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, certified by the Office of Attorney General as a criminal justice agency as defined under 18 Pa.C.S. § 9102 (relating to definitions).(iii) A railroad or street railway police department formed with officers commissioned under 22 Pa.C.S. Ch. 33 (relating to railroad and street railway police) or any prior statute providing for the commissioning.(iv) An airport authority police department, including the Harrisburg International Airport Police.(v) A county park police force created under section 2511(b) of the former act of August 9, 1955 (P.L.323, No.130), known as The County Code, or 16 Pa.C.S. § 16511(b) (relating to employees and police)."Officer." The term shall include the following:(i) An employee of a law enforcement agency who is empowered to enforce the provisions of 18 Pa.C.S. (relating to crimes and offenses) and other laws of this Commonwealth.(ii) A member of the Pennsylvania State Police.(iii) A corrections officer as defined under 61 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions).(iv) A waterways patrolman and a deputy waterways patrolman as the terms are defined in 30 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions).(v) An officer as defined under section 102 (relating to definitions).(vi) A county sheriff, full-time deputy sheriff employed by a county sheriff in this Commonwealth or a 20250SB0469PN1832 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 part-time deputy sheriff employed by a county sheriff in this Commonwealth.Section 3. Section 2709(a)(2) of Title 34 is amended by adding a subparagraph to read:§ 2709. License costs and fees.(a) License costs.--Any person who qualifies under the provisions of this chapter shall be issued the applicable license upon payment of the following costs and the issuing agent's fee:* * *(2) * * *(vii) Law enforcement hunting - $1.* * *Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0469PN1832 - 5 - 1234567891011121314